Washington statutes.
RCW 18.54.060

Quorum.

A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure.

[ 2022 c 240 s 24; 1963 c 25 s 6.]